North Carolina statutes. Chapter 159. Local Government Finance.
Part 3. Fiscal Control.

§ 159-24.
Finance officer.

Each local government and public authority shall, at all times, have a finance officer appointed by the local government, public authority, or designated official to hold office at the pleasure of the appointing board or official. The finance officer may be entitled “accountant,” “treasurer,” “finance director,” “finance officer,” or any other reasonably descriptive title. The duties of the finance officer may be imposed on the budget officer or any other officer or employee on whom the duties of budget officer may be imposed.

History.

1971, c. 780, s. 1; 1973, c. 474, s. 17; 2019-19, s. 6.1.

Local Modification.

(As to Part 3) Durham: 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 666, s. 1; (As to Part 3) city of Durham: 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 616, s. 1.

Cross References.

As to the Local Government Fiscal Information Act, see

G.S. 120-30.41

et seq.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2019-19, s. 6.1, effective June 3, 2019, substituted “shall, at all times, have a finance officer appointed by the local government, public authority, or designated official” for “shall appoint a finance officer.”

§ 159-25.
Duties of finance officer; dual signatures on checks; internal control procedures subject to Commission regulation.

The finance officer shall have the following powers and duties:

Keep the accounts of the local government or public authority in accordance with generally accepted principles of governmental accounting and the rules and regulations of the Commission.

Disburse all funds of the local government or public authority in strict compliance with this Chapter, the budget ordinance, and each project ordinance and shall preaudit obligations and disbursements as required by this Chapter.

Prepare and file with the board a statement of the financial condition of the local government or public authority, as often as may be requested by the governing board or the manager.

Receive and deposit all moneys accruing to the local government or public authority, or supervise the receipt and deposit of money by other duly authorized officers or employees.

Maintain all records concerning the bonded debt and other obligations of the local government or public authority, determine the amount of money that will be required for debt service or the payment of other obligations during each fiscal year, and maintain all sinking funds.

Supervise the investment of idle funds of the local government or public authority.

Perform such other duties as may be assigned by law, by the manager, budget officer, or governing board, or by rules and regulations of the Commission.

Attend any training required by the Local Government Commission under this section.

Contract with outside entities, including certified public accountants in good standing with the North Carolina State Board of Certified Public Accountant Examiners, bookkeeping firms, councils of government, and other units of government, to ensure fulfillment of the duties enumerated in this subsection, excluding subdivision (6), except where specifically allowed by law, and subdivision (8). Regardless of the entity performing such duties, the authority, powers, and duties of the finance officer shall not be superseded, and the responsibility for accurate and timely fulfillment of duties lies solely with the finance officer.

All references in other portions of the General Statutes, local acts, or city charters to county, city, special district, or public authority accountants, treasurers, or other officials performing any of the duties conferred by this section on the finance officer shall be deemed to refer to the finance officer.

Except as otherwise provided by law, all checks or drafts on an official depository shall be signed by the finance officer or a properly designated deputy finance officer and countersigned by another official of the local government or public authority designated for this purpose by the governing board. If the board makes no other designation, the chairman of the board or chief executive officer of the local government or public authority shall countersign these checks and drafts. The governing board of a unit or authority may waive the requirements of this subsection if the board determines that the internal control procedures of the unit or authority will be satisfactory in the absence of dual signatures.

The Local Government Commission has authority to issue rules and regulations having the force of law governing procedures for the receipt, deposit, investment, transfer, and disbursement of money and other assets by units of local government and public authorities, may inquire into and investigate the internal control procedures of a local government or public authority, may require any modifications in internal control procedures which, in the opinion of the Commission, are necessary or desirable to prevent embezzlements or mishandling of public moneys, and may adopt rules establishing minimum qualifications for finance officers.

The Local Government Commission has the authority to require any finance officer or any other employee who performs the duties of a finance officer to participate in training related to the powers, duties, and responsibilities of the finance officer under any of the following circumstances: (i) the Commission is exercising its authority under Article 10 of this Chapter with respect to the employing local government or public authority, (ii) the employing local government or public authority has received a unit letter from the Commission due to a deficiency in complying with this Chapter, (iii) the employing local government or public authority has an internal control material weakness or significant deficiency in the most recently completed financial audit, or (iv) the finance officer fails to annually meet or attest to the minimum qualifications of the position, as established by the Commission. The training may be provided by the Commission, the School of Government at the University of North Carolina, the North Carolina Community College System, the North Carolina League of Municipalities, the North Carolina Association of County Commissioners, or other qualified sources at the choice of the governing board and upon the prior approval of the Commission. When the Commission requires a finance officer or other employee to participate in training as authorized in this subsection, the Commission shall notify the finance officer or other employee and the employing local government or public authority of the required training. Upon completion of the required training by the finance officer or other employee, the employing local government or public authority shall submit, in writing, to the Commission proof that the training requirements have been satisfied.

The Local Government Commission may require any local government or public authority to contract with outside entities in accordance with the terms of subdivision (9) of subsection (a) of this section if the local government or public authority has received a unit letter from the Commission due to a deficiency in complying with this Chapter or the local government or public authority has an internal control finding in the most recently completed financial audit.

History.

1971, c. 780, s. 1; 1973, c. 474, ss. 18-20; 1975, c. 514, s. 10; 1987, c. 796, s. 3(5); 2016-84, s. 1; 2017-105, s. 1; 2019-19, s. 6.2; 2021-124, s. 4.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2016-84, s. 1, effective June 30, 2016, in subdivision (a)(1), substituted “Keep” for “He shall keep”; in subdivision (a)(2), substituted “Disburse” for “He shall disburse”; in subdivision (a)(3), substituted “Prepare” for “As often as may be requested by the governing board or the manager, he shall prepare,” and “authority, as often as may be requested by the governing board or the manager” for “authority”; in subdivision (a)(4), substituted “Receive” for “He shall receive”; in subdivision (a)(5), substituted “Maintain” for “He shall maintain”; in subdivision (a)(6), substituted “Supervise” for “He shall supervise”; in subdivision (a)(7), substituted “Perform” for “He shall perform”; added subdivision (a)(8); and added subsection (d).

Session Laws 2017-105, s. 1, effective July 12, 2017, added the last two sentences in subsection (d).

Session Laws 2019-19, s. 6.2, effective June 3, 2019, added (a)(9) and subsection (e); in subsection (c), added “and may adopt rules establishing minimum qualifications for finance officers” at the end; in subsection (d), substituted “under any of the following circumstances: (i)” for “if”’; inserted “(ii),” added clauses (iii) and (iv); and made related changes.

Session Laws 2021-124, s. 4, effective August 30, 2021, in subsection (d), deleted “Local Government” preceding the fourth occurrence of “Commission”, and substituted “training may be provided by the Commission” for “Commission may collaborate with” and “the North Carolina League of Municipalities, the North Carolina Association of County Commissioners, or other qualified sources at the choice of the governing board and upon the prior approval of the Commission” for “and other educational institutions in the State to develop and deliver the training required by this subsection.”

§ 159-26.
Accounting system.

System Required. — Each local government or public authority shall establish and maintain an accounting system designed to show in detail its assets, liabilities, equities, revenues, and expenditures. The system shall also be designed to show appropriations and estimated revenues as established in the budget ordinance and each project ordinance as originally adopted and subsequently amended.

Funds Required. — Each local government or public authority shall establish and maintain in its accounting system such of the following funds and ledgers as are applicable to it. The generic meaning of each type of fund or ledger listed below is that fixed by generally accepted accounting principles. [The funds and ledgers are as follows:]

General fund.

Special Revenue Funds. — One or more separate funds shall be established for each of the following classes: (i) functions or activities financed in whole or in part by property taxes voted by the people, (ii) service districts established pursuant to the Municipal or County Service District Acts, and (iii) grant project ordinances. If more than one function is accounted for in a voted tax fund, or more than one district in a service district fund, or more than one grant project in a project fund, separate accounts shall be established in the appropriate fund for each function, district, or project.

Debt service funds.

A Fund for Each Utility or Enterprise Owned or Operated by the Unit or Public Authority. — If a water system and a sanitary sewerage system are operated as a consolidated system, one fund may be established and maintained for the consolidated system.

Internal service funds.

Capital Project Funds. — Such a fund shall be established to account for the proceeds of each bond order or order authorizing any debt instrument and for all other resources used for the capital projects financed by the bond or debt instrument proceeds. A unit or public authority may account for two or more bond orders or orders authorizing any debt instrument in one capital projects fund, but the proceeds of each such order and the other revenues associated with that order shall be separately accounted for in the fund.

Trust and custodial funds, including a fund for each special district, public authority, or school administrative unit whose taxes or special assessments are collected by the unit.

A ledger or group of accounts in which to record the details relating to the capital assets of the unit or public authority.

A ledger or group of accounts in which to record the details relating to the general obligation bonds and notes and other long-term obligations of the unit.In addition, each unit or public authority shall establish and maintain any other funds required by other statutes or by State or federal regulations.

Basis of Accounting. — Except as otherwise provided by regulation of the Commission, local governments and public authorities shall use the modified accrual basis of accounting in recording transactions.

Encumbrance Systems. — Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, no local government or public authority is required to record or show encumbrances in its accounting system. Each city or town with a population over 10,000 and each county with a population over 50,000 shall maintain an accounting system that records and shows the encumbrances outstanding against each category of expenditure appropriated in its budget ordinance. Any other local government or any public authority may record and show encumbrances in its accounting system. In determining a unit’s population, the most recent federal decennial census shall be used.

Commission Regulations. — The Commission may prescribe rules and regulations having the force of law as to:

Features of accounting systems to be maintained by local governments and public authorities.

Bases of accounting, including identifying in detail the characteristics of a modified accrual basis, identifying what revenues are susceptible to accrual, and permitting or requiring use of a basis other than modified accrual in a fund that does not account for the receipt of a tax.

Definitions of terms not clearly defined in this Article.

The Commission may vary these rules and regulations according to any other criteria reasonably related to the purpose or complexity of the financial operations involved.

History.

1971, c. 780, s. 1; 1975, c. 514, ss. 11, 16; 1979, c. 402, s. 6; 1981, c. 685, ss. 6, 7; 1987, c. 796, s. 3(6); 2021-60, s. 3.4.

§ 159-27.
Distribution of tax collections among funds according to levy.

The finance officer shall distribute property tax collections among the appropriate funds, according to the budget ordinance, at least monthly.

Taxes collected during the current fiscal year, that were levied in any one of the two immediately preceding fiscal years, shall be distributed to the appropriate funds according to the levy of the fiscal year in which they were levied. If any fund for which such taxes were levied is not being maintained in the current fiscal year, the proportionate share of the tax that would have been distributed to the discontinued fund shall be allocated (i) to the fund from which the activity or function for which the tax was levied is then being financed, or (ii) to the general fund if the activity or function for which the tax was levied is no longer being performed.

Taxes collected during the current fiscal year, that were levied in any prior fiscal year other than one of the two immediately preceding fiscal years, may be distributed in the discretion of the governing board either (i) to the general fund, or (ii) in accordance with subsection (b) of this section. This subsection shall not repeal any portion of a local act or city charter inconsistent herewith and in effect on July 1, 1973.

This section applies to taxes levied by a unit of local government on behalf of another unit, including school administrative units.

History.

1971, c. 780, s. 1; 1973, c. 474, s. 21; 1975, c. 437, s. 15.

§ 159-27.1.
Use of revenue bond project reimbursements; restrictions.

The finance officer of a unit shall deposit any funds received by the unit as a reimbursement of a loan or advance made by the unit pursuant to G.S. 159-83(a)(8a) in the fund from which the unit originally derived the funds to make the loan or advance.

If the funds originally loaned or advanced were proceeds of a bond issue, any funds received as reimbursement shall be applied as required by this section. The funds shall be applied as provided in the instrument securing payment of the bond issue if the instrument contains applicable provisions. Otherwise, the funds shall be applied to either (i) the same general purposes as those for which the bond issue was authorized, or (ii) payment of debt service on the bond issue, including principal, interest, and premium, if any, upon redemption, or payment of the purchase price of bonds for retirement at not more than their face value and accrued interest.
After all the bonds of the issue have been paid or satisfied in full, any funds received as reimbursement shall be deposited in the general fund of the unit and may be used for any general fund purpose.

History.

1991, c. 508, s. 3; c. 761, s. 29.

§ 159-28.
Budgetary accounting for appropriations.

Incurring Obligations. — No obligation may be incurred in a program, function, or activity accounted for in a fund included in the budget ordinance unless the budget ordinance includes an appropriation authorizing the obligation and an unencumbered balance remains in the appropriation sufficient to pay in the current fiscal year the sums obligated by the transaction for the current fiscal year. No obligation may be incurred for a capital project or a grant project authorized by a project ordinance unless that project ordinance includes an appropriation authorizing the obligation and an unencumbered balance remains in the appropriation sufficient to pay the sums obligated by the transaction. Nothing in this section shall require a contract to be reduced to writing.

(a1)

Preaudit Requirement. —

If an obligation is reduced to a written contract or written agreement requiring the payment of money, or is evidenced by a written purchase order for supplies and materials, the written contract, agreement, or purchase order shall include on its face a certificate stating that the instrument has been preaudited to assure compliance with subsection (a) of this section. The certificate, which shall be signed by the finance officer, or any deputy finance officer approved for this purpose by the governing board, shall take substantially the following form:

Click to view

(a2)

Failure to Preaudit. —

An obligation incurred in violation of subsection (a) or (a1) of this section is invalid and may not be enforced. The finance officer shall establish procedures to assure compliance with this section, in accordance with any rules adopted by the Local Government Commission.

(a3)

Use of Automated System for Preaudit. —

An automated financial computer system may be used to meet the requirements of subsection (a1) of this section if an annual certification is filed with the Secretary of the Commission pursuant to subsection (a4) of this section. The provisions of this subsection do not apply to transactions exempted by statute from the preaudit requirement. The automated computer system must have all of the following:

Embedded functionality that determines that there is an appropriation to the department, function code, or project in which the transaction appropriately falls.

Functionality ensuring that unencumbered funds remain in the appropriation to pay out any amounts that are expected to come due during the budgeted period.

Real-time visibility to budget compliance, alert threshold notifications, and rules-based compliance measures and enforcement.

(a4)

Annual Certification of Automated Preaudit System. —

When an automated financial computer system is used to meet the requirements of subsection (a1) of this section, the finance officer shall certify to the Secretary of the Commission no later than 30 days after the start of the unit’s or public authority’s fiscal year that the automated financial computer system meets all the requirements of subsection (a3) of this section. The Secretary may reject or revoke the finance officer’s certification if the annual audit for the unit’s or public authority’s immediately preceding fiscal year includes a finding of budgetary noncompliance or if the Secretary determines that the automated financial computer system fails to meet the requirements of subsection (a3) of this section.

Disbursements. — When a bill, invoice, or other claim against a local government or public authority is presented, the finance officer shall either approve or disapprove the necessary disbursement. If the claim involves a program, function, or activity accounted for in a fund included in the budget ordinance or a capital project or a grant project authorized by a project ordinance, the finance officer may approve the claim only if both of the following apply:

The finance officer determines the amount to be payable.

The budget ordinance or a project ordinance includes an appropriation authorizing the expenditure and either (i) an encumbrance has been previously created for the transaction or (ii) an unencumbered balance remains in the appropriation sufficient to pay the amount to be disbursed.The finance officer may approve a bill, invoice, or other claim requiring disbursement from an intragovernmental service fund or trust or custodial fund not included in the budget ordinance, only if the amount claimed is determined to be payable. A bill, invoice, or other claim may not be paid unless it has been approved by the finance officer or, under subsection (c) of this section, by the governing board. The finance officer shall establish procedures to assure compliance with this subsection, in accordance with any rules adopted by the Local Government Commission.

Governing Board Approval of Bills, Invoices, or Claims. — The governing board may, as permitted by this subsection, approve a bill, invoice, or other claim against the local government or public authority that has been disapproved by the finance officer. The governing board may not approve a claim for which no appropriation appears in the budget ordinance or in a project ordinance, or for which the appropriation contains no encumbrance and the unencumbered balance is less than the amount to be paid. The governing board shall approve payment by formal resolution stating the board’s reasons for allowing the bill, invoice, or other claim. The resolution shall be entered in the minutes together with the names of those voting in the affirmative. The chairman of the board, or some other member designated for this purpose, shall sign the certificate on the check or draft given in payment of the bill, invoice, or other claim. If payment results in a violation of law, each member of the board voting to allow payment is jointly and severally liable for the full amount of the check or draft given in payment.

Payment. — A local government or public authority may not pay a bill, invoice, salary, or other claim except by any of the following methods:

Check or draft on an official depository.

Bank wire transfer from an official depository.

Electronic payment or an electronic funds transfer originated by the local government or public authority through an official depository.

Cash, if the local government has adopted an ordinance authorizing the use of cash, and specifying the limits of the use of cash.

(d1)

Except as provided in this section, each check or draft on an official depository shall bear on its face a certificate signed by the finance officer or a deputy finance officer approved for this purpose by the governing board (or signed by the chairman or some other member of the board pursuant to subsection (c) of this section). The certificate shall take substantially the following form:

Click to view

(d2)

An electronic payment or electronic funds transfer shall be subject to the preaudit process in accordance with this section and any rules adopted by the Local Government Commission. The rules so adopted shall address execution of electronic payment or electronic funds transfer and how to indicate that the finance officer or duly appointed deputy finance officer has performed the preaudit process in accordance with this section. A finance officer or duly appointed deputy finance officer shall be presumed in compliance with this section if the finance officer or duly appointed deputy finance officer complies with the rules adopted by the Local Government Commission.

Penalties. — If an officer or employee of a local government or public authority incurs an obligation or pays out or causes to be paid out any funds in violation of this section, that officer or employee, and the sureties on any official bond for that officer or employee, are liable for any sums so committed or disbursed. If the finance officer or any duly appointed deputy finance officer gives a false certificate to any contract, agreement, purchase order, check, draft, or other document, the finance officer or duly appointed deputy finance officer, and the sureties on any official bond, are liable for any sums illegally committed or disbursed thereby. The governing board shall determine, by resolution, if payment from the official bond shall be sought and if the governing body will seek a judgment from the finance officer or duly appointed deputy finance officer for any deficiencies in the amount.

(e1)

Inclusion of the contract term in accordance with G.S. 143-133.3(b) shall be deemed in compliance with G.S. 143-133.3(a).

The certifications required by subsections (a1) and (d1) of this section shall not apply to any of the following:

An obligation or a document related to the obligation has been approved by the Local Government Commission.

Payroll expenditures, including all benefits for employees of the local government.

Electronic payments, as specified in rules adopted by the Local Government Commission.

As used in this section, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

Electronic funds transfer. — A transfer of funds initiated by using an electronic terminal, a telephone, a computer, or magnetic tape to instruct or authorize a financial institution or its agent to credit or debit an account.

Electronic payment. — Payment by charge card, credit card, debit card, gas card, procurement card, or electronic funds transfer.

“This instrument has been preaudited in the manner required by the Local Government Budget and Fiscal Control Act. (Signature of finance officer).”

“This disbursement has been approved as required by the Local Government Budget and Fiscal Control Act. (Signature of finance officer).”

History.

1971, c. 780, s. 1; 1973, c. 474, ss. 22, 23; 1975, c. 514, s. 12; 1979, c. 402, ss. 7, 8; 2010-99, s. 1; 2012-156, s. 1; 2015-246, s. 6(a); 2015-294, s. 2; 2021-58, s. 3; 2021-60, s. 3.5.

§ 159-28.1.
Facsimile signatures.

The governing board of a local government or public authority may provide by appropriate resolution or ordinance for the use of facsimile signature machines, signature stamps, or similar devices in signing checks and drafts and in signing the preaudit certificate on contracts or purchase orders. The board shall charge the finance officer or some other bonded officer or employee with the custody of the necessary machines, stamps, plates, or other devices, and that person and the sureties on his official bond are liable for any illegal, improper, or unauthorized use of them.

History.

1975, c. 514, s. 13.

§ 159-29.
Fidelity bonds.

The finance officer shall give a true accounting and faithful performance bond with sufficient sureties in an amount to be fixed by the governing board, not less than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000). The premium on the bond shall be paid by the local government or public authority.

Each officer, employee, or agent of a local government or public authority who handles or has in his custody more than one hundred dollars ($100.00) of the unit’s or public authority’s funds at any time, or who handles or has access to the inventories of the unit or public authority, shall, before being entitled to assume his duties, give a faithful performance bond with sufficient sureties payable to the local government or public authority. The governing board shall determine the amount of the bond, and the unit or public authority may pay the premium on the bond. Each bond, when approved by the governing board, shall be deposited with the clerk to the board.If another statute requires an officer, employee, or agent to be bonded, this subsection does not require an additional bond for that officer, employee, or agent.

A local government or public authority may adopt a system of blanket faithful performance bonding as an alternative to individual bonds. If such a system is adopted, statutory requirements of individual bonds, except for elected officials and for finance officers and tax collectors by whatever title known, do not apply to an officer, employee, or agent covered by the blanket bond. However, although an individual bond is required for an elected official, a tax collector, or finance officer, such an officer or elected official may also be included within the coverage of a blanket bond if the blanket bond protects against risks not protected against by the individual bond.

History.

1971, c. 780, s. 1; 1975, c. 514, s. 14; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 975, s. 32; 2005-238, s. 2.